Massachusetts, session 194th, H1207.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 41A of chapter 171 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 2 and 3, the words “, established for personal,
family or household purposes,”
of 1